Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-70] Additional powers.
The powers conferred upon the corporation by this part shall be in addition and
supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing in this part
shall be construed as limiting any powers, rights, privileges, or immunities so
conferred. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next